Massachusetts, session 194th, S2499.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The state superintendent of buildings shall erect within the state house in a location to be
determined by the art commission a suitable plaque to commemorate the heroic services in the
Global War on Terror of the service members from Massachusetts who were awarded the
congressional medal of honor.
of 1